California statutes. Public Resources Code
The principal and interest on district bonds shall be paid by the county treasurer, if payable at his office, in the manner now or hereafter provided by law for the payment of principal and interest on the bonds of the county, unless said bonds shall be made payable elsewhere.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Funds [13170. - 13176.]

13170.

In a fund called the “Resort Improvement District General Fund,” the treasurer shall place and keep the money levied by the board for that fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13171.

The proceeds of the sale of revenue bonds or general obligation bonds or proceeds of special assessments levied by the board shall be deposited with the treasurer and shall be placed in a fund to be called the “Resort Improvement District Construction Fund No. ____” (inserting number).

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13172.

The money in any construction fund shall be used for the purpose indicated in the resolution calling the election upon the question of the issuance of bonds, or for the purpose described in the resolution of intention in the assessment proceedings, or for repayment of money borrowed for the purpose of financing the improvement for which bonds were subsequently issued or the assessment levied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13173.

The bond moneys may also be used for interest and working capital for the period of construction and for twelve (12) months thereafter, and also to pay the costs of their authorization and issuance including fees for legal, engineering, fiscal, economic or other service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13174.

Any money in the construction fund determined by resolution of the board to be in excess of the amounts required for completion of the improvement authorized may, by the resolution so determining, be transferred to any other fund of the district and be used for any lawful purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13175.

In a fund called the “Resort Improvement District Bond Fund ____” (inserting series number), the treasurer shall keep money levied or collected for that fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13176.

No part of the money belonging in the bond fund may be transferred to any other fund or be used for any purpose other than the payment of principal and interest of the bonds of the district, or for repayment of money borrowed for the purpose of paying the principal and interest of the bonds of the district, until said bonds are fully paid, at which time it may be transferred to any other fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 11. Alternative Depositary of District Money [13190. - 13197.]

13190.

The provisions of this chapter are alternative or supplemental to those providing for the use of the county treasury.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13191.

The board may by resolution designate a bank as depositary of any or all of its funds. No question of interest shall affect such appointment. If the depositary is not designated for all of its funds, it shall designate what funds are to be deposited with the depositary. The county treasurer shall be the depositary for all funds not so designated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13192.

The charges of any depositary selected shall be a proper expense of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13193.

If the board appoints a depositary, it shall appoint a person who shall be known as finance officer, who shall serve at its pleasure. It shall fix the amount of his compensation. It shall fix the amount of and approve his bond. He may, but need not be a member of the board, or his office may be consolidated with that of the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13194.

Bond principal and interest and salaries shall be paid when due. All other claims and demands shall be approved in writing or in open meeting by a majority of the members of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13195.

Warrants shall be drawn by the finance officer and signed by the president and secretary, or one of them and one member of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13196.

The finance officer shall install and maintain a system of auditing and accounting that shall completely and at all times show the financial condition of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13197.

The finance officer shall make annual or earlier written reports to the board, as it shall determine, as to the receipts and disbursements and balances in the several accounts under his control. The report shall be signed by him and filed with the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 12. Standby Charges [13215. - 13217.]

13215.

The district may, pursuant to the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code, fix by ordinance or resolution, on or before the first day of July in each calendar year, water or sewer standby or immediate availability charges. Each such charge shall not individually exceed twelve dollars ($12) per year for each acre of land, or eight dollars ($8) per year for each parcel of land of less than an acre within the district to which water or sewerage could be made available for any purpose by the district, whether the water or sewerage is actually used or not, unless the standby charge is imposed pursuant to the Uniform Standby Charge Procedures Act (Chapter 12.4 (commencing with Section 54984) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code). The district board may establish schedules varying the charges depending upon factors such as the uses to which the land is put, the cost of supplying such services to the land, and the amount of services used on the land. The district board may restrict the imposition of such charges to lands lying within one or more improvement districts within the district.

The limitations contained in this section shall not apply to any district which levied a standby charge pursuant to the County Service Area Law (Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 25210) of Part 2 of Division 2 of Title 3 of the Government Code) prior to January 1, 1977. Any such district shall be subject to Section 25215.6 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 158, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

13216.

If the procedures set forth in this section as it read at the time a standby or immediate availability charge was established were followed, the district board may, by ordinance or resolution, continue the charge pursuant to Section 13215 in successive years at the same rate. If new, increased, or extended assessments are proposed, the district board shall comply with the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 27, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

13217.

If any water or sewer standby or immediate availability charge remains unpaid on the first day of the month in which the board of supervisors of the county in which the district is located is required by law to levy the amount of taxes required for county purposes, a 6-percent penalty thereon shall accrue. The amount of the unpaid charges plus the penalty shall constitute a special assessment upon the land with respect to which the services, for which charges are unpaid, were available or in existence on a standby basis, and shall constitute a lien on that land. The assessment shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as ad valorem taxes are collected and shall be subject to the same penalties and the same procedures upon sale in the case of delinquency as provided for such taxes. All laws applicable to the levy, collection, and enforcement of ad volorem taxes shall be applicable to the assessment; except that if any real property to which such lien would attach has been transferred or conveyed to a bona fide purchaser for value, or if a lien of a bona fide encumbrancer for the value has been created and attaches thereon, prior to the date on which the first installment of such taxes would become delinquent, then the lien which would otherwise be imposed by this section shall not attach to such real property and the unpaid charges, and any penalty thereon, relating to such property shall be transferred to the unsecured roll for collection.

At least 15 days before the first day of the month in which the board of supervisors is required by law to levy the amount of taxes required for county purposes, the district board shall furnish in writing both to the board of supervisors and to the county auditor, a description of each parcel of land within the district upon which a standby or immediate availability charge or charges remains unpaid, together with a statement setting forth both the amount of the unpaid charge or charges and the amount of the penalty on each parcel of land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1281.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 13. Portion of District Included in a County Water District [13230. - 13233.]

13230.

Nothing in this division shall be construed to authorize or permit a district to operate any facilities for furnishing any water services in any portion of the district which is included within a county water district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13231.

The county water district may elect to install the facilities for furnishing water services within any area that is included within both districts. In such event, the district shall provide the funds that are required therefor that the county water district would not otherwise provide.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13232.

The county water district may elect to have the facilities installed by the district for providing water services within any area that is included within both districts. In such event, the facilities shall be installed by the district in conformity with plans and specifications previously approved by the county water district, and under such inspection and approval as it shall direct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------

13232.3.

The Grizzly Lake Resort Improvement District, the Napa-Berryessa Resort Improvement District, and the Lake Berryessa Resort Improvement District may contract with any state agency to finance any district improvement authorized by this division that is related to the provision of water for human consumption. The terms of the contract shall be consistent with this division. Notwithstanding any other provision in this division, the term of the contract may extend up to 30 years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 606, Sec. 5.   Effective October 9, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

13233.

Nothing in this division shall be construed to repeal or limit any power possessed by a county water district within which there is any part of this district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2069.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 12. CALIFORNIA CONSERVATION CORPS [14000. - 14424.]



CHAPTER 1. Findings and Declarations of Policy [14000. - 14004.]

14000.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that every California youth should be encouraged to reach their full potential, but that many youths require guidance and support to reach their goals and make positive changes in their lives.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that conserving or developing natural resources, and enhancing and maintaining environmentally important lands and waters through the use of California’s young adults, is beneficial not only to the youth of the state by providing them with educational and work opportunities, but also is beneficial for the state’s economy and its environment.

(c) The Legislature further finds and declares that the California Conservation Corps continues to offer California a unique opportunity to meet both the goal of increasing understanding and appreciation of the environment and the goal of helping youths become productive adults.

(d) The Legislature therefore reaffirms its intent that the corps’ mission includes increasing awareness of and improving our natural resources, but more importantly, includes instilling basic skills and a healthy work ethic in California youth, building their character, self-esteem, and self-discipline, and establishing within them a strong sense of civic responsibility and understanding of the value of a day’s work for a day’s wages.

(e) It
 is the further intent of the Legislature that corpsmembers graduate from the corps with good work habits, positive attitudes, and broadened professional horizons. It is the intent of the Legislature that the corps blend academic and job skills training with personal growth opportunities in order to develop productive youths who can make substantial contributions as California workers and citizens.

(f) It is the further intent of the Legislature, in memory of Brien Thomas “B.T.” Collins and John E. “Jack” Dugan, and on behalf of their passion, support, and commitment to the mission of the corps, to ensure that the corps is an entrepreneurial and incentive-based program with stable and predictable funding. In pursuit of that goal, it is the intent of the Legislature that all state agencies look to the corps first to perform those projects that
 meet the mission of the corps.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 98.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14001.

In the Natural Resources Agency there is the California Conservation Corps, which shall be responsible for carrying out the purposes of, and implementing the findings and policies set forth in, this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 635, Sec. 1.   (AB 2126)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

14002.

The Legislature finds and declares that the California Conservation Corps provides an invaluable service. The Legislature supports the corps’ mission to enhance the educational opportunities and employability of corps members. To further this mission local community college districts and the corps are encouraged to enter into cooperative agreements so that corps members have access to equal educational opportunities.

Local community college districts are encouraged to recognize the unique needs and circumstances of the corps members and the corps’ need for adequate facilities. Local community college districts should, to the extent possible, develop procedures to address these unique needs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1710, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

14003.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that the State of California has already established a model conservation corps program and that redundant federal and state programs to carry out resource protection and conservation within the state are not in the best interests of the state. Rather, it is in the best interests of the state that federal funds designated to be expended by federal agencies for this purpose be allocated, to the extent feasible, to the California Conservation Corps and local conservation corps.

(b) If federal funds are available for youth conservation corps or community service corps programs, excluding the federal Job Corps, the California Conservation Corps is hereby designated as the program recipient for the State of California, and the corps may distribute, as appropriate, any federal funds to other corps programs within the state. The director shall have the authority to adopt, amend, and repeal policies to implement the program consistent with the federal requirements and with this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 463, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14004.

In memory of Brien Thomas “B.T.” Collins, and on behalf of his passion, support, and commitment to the mission of the corps, the California Conservation Corps headquarters in Sacramento is hereby named the “B.T. Collins California Conservation Corps Building.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 894, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Definitions [14100. - 14102.]

14100.

Unless context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this chapter govern the construction of this division.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 904.)
-------------------------------------------

14101.

“Corps” means the California Conservation Corps.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 342.)
-------------------------------------------

14102.

“Director” means the Director of the California Conservation Corps.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 50, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Program [14300. - 14318.]

14300.

Young adults participating in the corps program shall generally be engaged in projects that do the following:

(a) Preserve, maintain, and enhance environmentally important lands and waters.

(b) Accomplish useful and needed public works projects in both urban and rural areas.

(c) Conserve, maintain, improve, and develop natural resources in both urban and rural areas.

(d) Provide opportunities for public use of, or education in, the areas, projects, and resources described in
 subdivisions (a), (b), and (c).

(e) Assist in emergency operations, such as natural disaster relief and the rescue of lost and injured persons.

(f) Assist in fire prevention and suppression.

(g) Directly contribute to the conservation of energy.

(h) Contribute toward making public facilities accessible to persons with disabilities.

(i) Assist departments within the Resources Agency in developing, rehabilitating, and restoring parklands, recreational facilities, and historical resources; restoring salmon and steelhead spawning, nursery, and rearing habitat; restoring and preserving wildlife
 habitat; and enhancing reforestation in both urban and rural areas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 99.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14301.

The Governor shall appoint a director, who shall act as the administrative officer of the corps, and a deputy director. The appointment of the director is subject to confirmation by the Senate at the next regular or special session of the Legislature, and the refusal or failure of the Senate to confirm the appointment shall create a vacancy in the office. The director and deputy director shall be exempt from civil service, under subdivision (f) of Section 4 of Article XXIV of the California Constitution. The director shall employ, pursuant to the provisions of Article XXIV of the California Constitution and Part 2 (commencing with Section 18500) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, such staff as is necessary to implement the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 787.)
-------------------------------------------

14302.

Young adults shall be selected for participation in the corps program on the basis of motivation for hard work, personal development, and public service, and without regard to their prior employment or educational background. Participation shall be for a period of one year, which may be extended.

The corps, in conjunction with the Employment Development Department, shall place an emphasis on developing and executing plans to assist corpsmembers in obtaining employment following their participation in the corps program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 100.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14302.5.

(a) The corps shall collaborate with the Department of Veterans Affairs and the Employment Development Department to assist any corpsmember who is a veteran of the United States Armed Forces in obtaining employment after participating in the corps program.

(b) Collaboration efforts by the Department of Veterans Affairs shall include, but not be limited to, providing access to veterans supportive services. Collaboration efforts by the Employment Development Department shall include, but not be limited to,
 providing access to workforce services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 485, Sec. 2.   (SB 1227)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

14303.

The director may employ special corpsmembers without regard to their age so that the corps may draw upon their special skills which may contribute to the attainment of the objectives of the program. Special corpsmembers may be assigned to headquarters, as well as field positions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 50, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

14304.

Projects shall be directed toward providing opportunities to the public for their education or the use of these natural resources and environmentally important public lands and waters, while at the same time providing young adults with an opportunity for personal development in a variety of basic skills. Projects shall be undertaken in both urban and rural areas and shall be selected on the basis of the environmental and natural resource benefits each offers, the opportunities for public education or use each offers, and the on-the-job training value of each.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 101.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

14305.

In order to protect the rights of corpsmembers individually and the corps as a community, the director shall adopt a corpsmember bill of rights, corpsmember grievance procedures, and search and seizure guidelines.

These adopted rights, procedures, and guidelines shall serve to assist the director and corps staff in identifying problems and conflicts and resolving them with a minimum disruption of work and training, and shall be used by corps supervisors to interpret and consistently enforce policies and procedures of the corps.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 50, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

14306.

To implement this division, the director may do all of the following:

(a) Recruit and enroll corpsmembers and special corpsmembers.

(b) Adopt criteria for selecting applicants for enrollment in the corps’ program, including criteria for individuals convicted of a crime described in the California Uniform Controlled Substances Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 11000) of the Health and Safety Code). The director shall take into account, when adopting this criteria, the health, safety, and welfare of the public and the corps’ program participants and staff.

(c) Execute contracts containing the terms and conditions that are deemed necessary and desirable
 for the enrollment of corpsmembers.

(d) Authorize the use of the corps for emergency projects occasioned by natural disasters, fire prevention and suppression, rescue of lost or injured persons, and any other activity or project necessary or desirable to carry out the purposes of this division.

(e) Apply for and accept grants or contributions of funds from any public or private source.

(f) Purchase, rent, or otherwise acquire or obtain necessary property, supplies, instruments, tools, equipment, and conveniences.

(g) Execute contracts for furnishing the services of the corps to any federal, state, or local public agency; any California Native American tribe; any local or statewide private organization concerned with the objectives of the corps’ program,
 as specified in Sections 14000 and 14300; and any person, firm, partnership, or corporation concerned with these objectives.

(h) Procure insurance.

(i) Be reimbursed by the federal government, any state or local public agency, any California Native American tribe, or any private organization for actual expenses incurred by the corps for any project undertaken for any such entity pursuant to subdivision (d) or (g) or pursuant to Section 14307.

(j) To the extent permitted by Article VII of the California Constitution, execute contracts with any person, natural or corporate, for the purpose of implementing the objectives of the corps, as specified in Sections 14000 and 14300.

(k) Use any services, material, or property of any agency of the state, and may
 make agreements with any agency of the state or take other actions that are reasonable and necessary.

(l) Contract with public or private nonprofit entities to provide services for the corps.

(m) Contract with the University of California, the California State University, the community college districts, and private institutions for the creation of special admission and tuition credit programs for corpsmembers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 131, Sec. 3.   (AB 2966)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14306.5.

(a) In recruiting and enrolling corpsmembers and special corpsmembers, the director may select an applicant for enrollment in the corps program who is on probation, parole, postrelease community supervision, or mandatory supervision.

(b) When selecting an applicant for enrollment in the corps program pursuant to subdivision (a), the director shall consider the applicant’s overall fitness to join the corps, which shall include, but not be limited to, an
 assessment of all of the following:

(1) Any potential impacts the applicant may have on public safety as well as the safety of other members of the corps.

(2) Whether the applicant is required to register as a sex offender pursuant to Section 290 of the Penal Code.

(3) Whether the applicant is on lifetime parole.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 571, Sec. 1.   (AB 278)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

14306.6.

(a) In complying with subdivision (b) of Section 14306 and Section 14306.5 of this code and Section 12645g(a) of Title 42 of the United States Code, the corps shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice, pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code, for all persons applying for any of the following:

(1) Enrollment as a corpsmember in the corps program.

(2) A position as a special corpsmember, as described in Section 14303.

(3) A civil service position supervising corpsmembers.

(4) A civil service position funded in whole or in part by AmeriCorps.

(b) The Department of Justice shall provide a state- or federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 198, Sec. 18.   (SB 152)   Effective September 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14307.

Fire prevention, fire suppression, and disaster relief including, but not limited to, flood, earthquake, pest infestation assistance measures, and search and rescue efforts shall be a major emphasis of the program. Certain corps centers designated by the director as fire centers in locations specifically needed to assure emergency capability and readiness for firefighting and natural disaster relief shall be administered and directed jointly by the director of the corps and the Director of Forestry and Fire Protection. The director of the corps shall be responsible for setting the policies under which these centers shall be operated and shall be responsible for the recruitment, orientation, job training, project planning, and educational and other services generally provided in the corps at its base centers. The Director of Forestry and Fire Protection, and his or her designee, shall be responsible for the supervision of corps members engaged in public service conservation work and for the training, supervision, and direction of corps members engaged in fire prevention, fire suppression, and other emergency activities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 760, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14308.

In carrying out this division, the director may utilize any services, materials, or property of any agency of the state and may make any agreements with any agency of the state, or take any other actions, that are reasonable and necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 894, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

14309.

In order to provide the best and most cost-effective training possible for corps members and other state employees, state agencies shall seek to combine or share training programs that provide related skills.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 760, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

14310.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, corpsmembers and special corpsmembers, other than staff officers and employees, shall not receive state retirement benefits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 50, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

14311.

In keeping with the corps’ entrepreneurial nature and to expand the corpsmember population, the corps shall actively seek reimbursable work projects from state and nonstate entities that are in keeping with its mission. The corps shall use the following criteria in reviewing such a project offer:

(a) The project will provide opportunities to expand corpsmember population.

(b) The project will provide corpsmembers with education and training in employable skills.

(c) The project will attract community support, participation, and funding.

(d) The project conserves or enhances the state’s natural resources, or has other public benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 894, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

14312.

(a) The Collins-Dugan California Conservation Corps Reimbursement Account is hereby created in the General Fund in the State Treasury, for support of the corps.

(b) Funds received in payment for reimbursable work projects, excluding General Fund money, may be deposited in the Collins-Dugan California Conservation Corps Reimbursement Account.

(c) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, the money in the Collins-Dugan California Conservation Corps Reimbursement Account is hereby continuously appropriated to the corps for the following program activities:

(1) Program expansion to hire more corpsmembers.

(2) Enhancement of corpsmember education and educational support services.

(3) Enhancement of equipment used by corpsmembers in projects meeting the corps’ mission.

(4) Program support when legislatively directed reimbursement targets are unmet in a given fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 976, Sec. 1.   Effective September 27, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

14313.

To assist the corps’ operation as an entrepreneurial and incentive-based program, the director may seek and accept donations from private entities, foundations, or other sources outside of state government for purposes of accomplishing the corps’ mission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 894, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

14315.

(a) Subject to the availability of assistance from the corps, a state agency that is considering the use of contracted labor shall give priority to the corps when the mission of the corps and the nature of the state agency’s project are substantially consistent.

(b) State agencies shall notify the corps of potential contracts for services that fit within the parameters of the legislative intent set forth in Section 14000 and shall use the corps to the maximum extent feasible to carry out projects that promote the legislative intent as set forth in Section 14000. Because of the corps’ commitment to the state’s youth, in the exercise of a state agency’s discretion when considering contracts for services, strong consideration
 shall be given to the use of corpsmembers over the use of other contracted labor.

(c) The corps may contract with any state agency for the performance of activities consistent with this division.

(d) Upon appropriation by the Legislature and execution of a contract pursuant to subdivision (b), the Controller may transfer money to the Collins-Dugan California Conservation Corps Reimbursement Account from other funds under the control of the contracting state agency, including, but not limited to, the following funds and accounts:

(1) Hazardous Waste Control Account in the General Fund.

(2) State Highway Account in the State Transportation Fund.

(3) Transportation Planning and Development
 Account in the State Transportation Fund.

(4) California Environmental License Plate Fund.

(5) Fish and Game Preservation Fund.

(6) Public Resources Account in the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax Fund.

(7) Unallocated Account in the Cigarette and Tobacco Products Surtax Fund.

(8) Habitat Conservation Fund.

(9) Motor Vehicle Fuel Account in the Transportation Tax Fund pursuant to Section 8352.6 of the Revenue and Taxation Code (OMV Fund).

(10) Oil Spill Prevention and Administration Fund.

(11) Integrated Waste Management Account in the Integrated Waste Management Fund.

(12) State Parks and Recreation Fund.

(13) Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund.

(14) Employment Training Fund.

(15) Harbors and Watercraft Revolving Fund.

(16) California Beverage Container Recycling Fund.

(17) California Cannabis Tax Fund.

(18) Good Neighbor Authority Fund.

(e) Expenditures from the Collins-Dugan California Conservation Corps Reimbursement Account of amounts transferred pursuant to subdivision
 (d) shall be limited to purposes that are consistent with the requirements of each fund or account contributing each amount to the Collins-Dugan California Conservation Corps Reimbursement Account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 131, Sec. 4.   (AB 2966)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

14316.

The Department of Finance may make a loan from the General Fund to the Collins-Dugan California Conservation Corps Reimbursement Account, in an amount not to exceed a cumulative total of one million five hundred thousand dollars ($1,500,000) to meet cashflow needs due to delays in collecting reimbursements. Any loan made by the Department of Finance pursuant to this section shall only be made if the corps has a valid contract or certification signed by a client agency that demonstrates that sufficient funds will be available to repay the loan. All money so transferred shall be repaid to the General Fund as soon as possible, but not later than one year from the date of the loan, with interest at the average rate earned by the Surplus Money Investment Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 953, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

14318.

(a) The corps may enter into a contract with an individual or collective of community conservation corps certified pursuant to Section 14507.5 for a project or program that is in furtherance of Section 14000 and that consists of one or more of the following:

(1) Natural resources and land management projects.

(2) Energy and climate programs.

(3) Emergency response services.

(4) Educational, programming, and training services.

(5) Corpsmember services.

(6) Ancillary services.

(b) The director may establish guidelines for purposes of this section. If the director establishes guidelines for purposes of this section, a contract entered into pursuant to subdivision (a) shall adhere to those guidelines.

(c) (1) On or before January 1, 2025, January 1, 2027, and January 1, 2029, the corps shall file a report with the appropriate committees of the Legislature on the outcomes of any program or project undertaken pursuant to this section. A report filed pursuant to this subdivision shall focus on the previous two calendar years.

(2) The requirement to file a report pursuant to paragraph (1) is inoperative on January 1, 2033, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 139, Sec. 1.   (AB 1279)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.2. Training of County or City Members [14350. - 14351.]

14350.

The director may establish a training program for members of county or city conservation corps. The program may be designed to provide the same training to members of county or city conservation corps as provided to corpsmembers of the corps and may be conducted in the same facilities. The program is authorized only to the extent that it does not adversely affect the ability of the California Conservation Corps to maintain 2,000 active corpsmembers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 4, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14351.

If the corps establishes a training program as described in Section 14350, the corps may contract with the county or city requesting the training, and the contract may require the corps to be fully reimbursed for all costs of the training program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 4, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3.5. Nonresidential Program [14400. - 14406.]

14400.

The corps shall develop nonresidential programs in urban communities, and may develop those programs in other than urban communities, which have high concentrations of ethnic-minority youths, which have high levels of youth unemployment, and which have a need for conservation work. Expenditures for programs in other than urban communities shall not exceed 15 percent of total funding for programs under this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1606, Sec. 1.   Effective October 2, 1985.)
-------------------------------------------

14401.

The corps shall develop procedures for recruiting high school dropouts from the neighborhoods in which these programs are located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1710, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

14402.

The corps shall give priority to providing an educational component for corpsmembers who have not completed high school. The component shall be equal in content to a high school curriculum and provide course credits leading to a high school diploma or its equivalent, such as a California high school equivalency certificate. The work of the corps shall be structured to accommodate the educational component without significantly reducing the productivity of the corps.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1710, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

14403.
